Florida, session 2026, SB162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 395.1013, Florida Statutes, is created 13 to read: 14 395.1013âSmoke evacuation systems required.â 15 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 16 (a)ââSmoke evacuation systemâ means equipment that 17 effectively captures and filters surgical smoke before the smoke 18 makes contact with the eyes or respiratory tracts of occupants 19 in the room. 20 (b)ââSurgical smokeâ means the gaseous byproduct produced 21 by energy-generating devices, such as lasers and electrosurgical 22 devices. The term includes, but is not limited to, surgical 23 plume, smoke plume, bioaerosols, laser-generated airborne 24 contaminants, and lung-damaging dust. 25 (2)âBy January 1, 2027, each licensed facility shall adopt 26 and implement policies to prevent patients and personnel from 27 being exposed to surgical smoke that is deemed a health risk and 28 demonstrated by medical evidence as causing harm, including by 29 using a smoke evacuation system or any other appropriate measure 30 during any surgical procedure that is likely to generate 31 surgical smoke. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.